District of Columbia statutes.
16-921

Validity of marriage, action to determine.

When the validity of an alleged marriage is denied by either of the parties thereto the other party may institute an action for affirming the marriage, and upon due proof of the validity thereof the court shall decree it to be valid. The decree shall be conclusive upon all parties concerned.

Dec. 23, 1963, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
77 Stat. 563
1981 Ed., § 16-921.
1973 Ed., § 16-921.